Maine, session 132, LD222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §424-C, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Take-back and disposal program. In consultation with the Department of
Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal, when funds are available, the department
shall design and, by July 1, 2027, implement a take-back and disposal program for
firefighting and fire-suppressing foam to which PFAS have been intentionally added that
is located in the State and that is in the possession of a person located in the State. The
program must provide for the collection of such firefighting or fire-suppressing foam from
a person that voluntarily requests collection and for the safe and contained disposal of the
collected foam. The department may contract with a 3rd-party entity to implement and
administer the program and may adopt rules as necessary for the implementation and
administration of the program, which are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A. The department may receive funds, grants or contributions
from public or private sources to design and implement the program.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Firefighting Foam Disposal Program N968
Initiative: Provides baseline allocation to establish an account to accept funding for
contracted services related to the take-back and disposal of firefighting and fire-suppressing
foam containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 1 - 132LR0101(10)